Texas, session 892, HB143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter A, Chapter 41, Election Code, is amended by adding Section 41.0051 to read as follows: Sec. 41.0051.  ELECTION TO ISSUE BONDS.  (a)  An election for the issuance of bonds or other debt shall be held on the November uniform election date. (b)  Notwithstanding Section 41.0011, an election described by Subsection (a) may not be held as an emergency election under that section. (c)  If a law outside this code requires an election described by Subsection (a) to be held on a date other than the November uniform election date, the authority administering the election shall set the election date to comply with this section. SECTION 2.  The change in law made by this Act applies only to an election ordered on or after the effective date of this Act. An election ordered before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect when the election was ordered. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.